Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1492
Landlord; duties; powers.

(1) A landlord shall:

(a) Make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the mobile home park in a fit and habitable condition;

(b) Keep all common areas of the mobile home park in a clean and safe condition;

(c) Maintain in good and safe working order and condition all facilities supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord;

(d) Provide for the removal of garbage, rubbish, and other waste from the mobile home park; and

(e) Furnish outlets for provided utilities.

(2) A landlord shall not impose any condition connected with the rental or occupancy of a mobile home space which requires the tenant's exclusive use of a seller of fuel, furnishings, goods, services, or mobile homes unless such condition is necessary to protect the health, safety, aesthetic value, or welfare of mobile home tenants in the park. A landlord may impose reasonable requirements designed to standardize methods of utility connection and hookup. If any such conditions are imposed which result in charges for the goods or services, the charges shall not exceed the actual cost incurred in providing the tenant with the goods or services.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 43.